src/fst/stems/conjunctions.lexc
LEXICON Conjunctions

бөгөөд:бөгөөд ConjCoo ; ! "along with" ?
ба:ба ConjCoo ; ! "and"
бас:бас ConjCoo ; ! "and"
харин:харин ConjCoo ; ! ~"but"
эсвэл:эсвэл ConjCoo ; ! "if"
болон:болон ConjCoo ;
гэвч:гэвч ConjCoo ; ! "but"
буюу:буюу ConjCoo ;
хэрвээ:хэрвээ ConjCoo ; ! ~"if"
хэрэв:хэрэв ConjCoo ; ! ~"if"
болгон:болгон ConjCoo ; ! emphasiser?
боловч:боловч ConjCoo ; ! "although"
тул:тул ConjCoo ; ! "seeing that, insomuchas"




LEXICON ConjCoo
+CC: # ;
